apertium-tsz.tsz.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Purepecha

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <np>     # Proper-Noun
# <prn>    # Pronoun
# <v>      # Verb
# <adj>    # Adjective
# <obj>    # Object
# <det>    # Determinant
# <num>    # Number

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Verbs
# <nom>    # nominalising suffix
# <agnt>   # nominalising suffix (agent)
# <p1>     # 1st person
# <p2>     # 2nd person
# <p3>     # 3rd person
# <past>   # past
# <pres>   # present
# <fut>    # future
# <cni>    # conditional
# <pri>    # present indicative
# <perf>   # perfect (aspect)
# <dur>    # duration (aspect)
# <hab>    # habitual (aspect)
# <incp>   # inceptive
# <itg>    # interrogative


# Number morphology
# <pl>  # Plural
# <sg>  # Singular

# Other symbols
# >      # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS
NounRoot RegNounInfl
ProNounRoot ProNounInfl
PropNounRoot PropNounInfl
ObjectRoot RegNounInfl Object
LocativeRoot RegNounInfl Locative
Adjective [<adj>:]
Preposition [<pr>:]
Determiner DeterminerInfl
Number
# Verb VerbInfn
Verbs
# V-Stem AspectTime ModeInterrogative
Punctuation


PATTERN Verbs
V-Stem(1) [<v>:] V-Stem(2): AspectTime ModeInterrogative
# V-Stem(1) [<v>:] V-Stem(3): Infinitive

###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################

LEXICON RegNounInfl

<n><sg>:
<n><pl>:>echa

LEXICON ProNounInfl

<prn><sg>:

LEXICON PropNounInfl

<np><sg>:
<np><sg><obj>:>ni

LEXICON Object

<obj>:>ni

LEXICON Locative

<loc>:>rhu

LEXICON DeterminerInfl

<det>:
<det><obj>:>ni

LEXICON AspectTime

<pres>:
<pres><dur>:>xa
<pres><hab>:>sïn
<pres><perf>:>s
<pres><incp>:>xam
<past><dur>:>xap
<past><hab>:>sïam{M}
<past><perf>:>sp
<past><incp>:>xamam{M}
<cni>:>pirin
<fut>:>a

LEXICON ModeInterrogative

<nf>:>ni
<p1><sg>:>kani
<p1><pl>:>ksï
<p2><sg>:>ri
<p2><pl>:>tsï
<p3><sg>:>ti
<p3><pl>:>ksï
<itg>:>{K}i
<p1>:>{K2}a
<p2>:>{K2}a        #ambiguity


LEXICON NounRoot

wari:wari
ganádu:ganádu
kurúcha:kurúcha
karhasï:karhasï                 # worm
chpíri:chpíri                   # fire
acháati:acháati                 # man

LEXICON ProNounRoot
xí:xí                           # I
t’u:t’u                         # You

LEXICON PropNounRoot

María:María                     # Maria
Xwánu:Xwánu                     # Juan
Rósa:Rósa
Jose:Jose
Lúpi:Lúpi
Babilonia:Babilonia

LEXICON ObjectRoot

ganádu:ganádu
kurúcha:kurúcha
yurhíri:yurhíri
kuchíyu:kuchíyu                 # knife
táa:táa                         # house
sapí:sapí                       # child
ayxádu:ayxádu                   # godson
wíchu:wíchu                     # dog
xatsíkwarhikwa:xatsíkwarhikwa   # treasure or wealth
kabáyu:kabáyu                   # horse
doktóri:doktóri                 # doctor
xurámuti:xurámuti               # chief
kúchi:kúchi                     # pig
maríkwa:maríkwa                 # girl
tsakápu:tsakápu                 # stone
charháku:charháku               # baby
káxa:káxa                       # box
korráli:korráli                 # pen
tsúntsu:tsúntsu                 # pot
wátsï:wátsï                     # son/daughter
María:María                     # Maria
itsi:itsi                       # water
maríkwa:maríkwa                 # girl
tumpí:tumpí                     # boy
tsíri:tsíri                     # corn
tumína:tumína                   # money
acháati:acháati                 # man
wari:wari                       # woman
kwártu:kwártu                   # room
jurhiata:jurhiata               # sun
pirékua:pirékua                 # song
piré:piré                       # singer
ráma:ráma                       # branch
anátapu:anátapu                 # tree
pwérta:pwérta                   # door
táa:táa                         # house
te:te                           # corn cob
ajusï:ajusï                     # eye #1
akuitsi:akuitsi                 # snake
amanhejchakua:amanhejchakua     # fruit
ambajtsïtakua:ambajtsïtakua     # comb
auani:auani                     # rabbit
axuni:axuni                     # deer
chkári:chkári                   # lumber
ch’anakua:ch’anakua             # game
éjpu:éjpu                       # head
eramarhandikua:eramarhandikua   # light
iauakua:iauakua                 # ice
ichúskuta:ichúskuta             # tortilla
ireta:ireta                     # village
isingua:isingua                 # armadillo
itukua:itukua                   # salt
itsukua:itsukua                 # milk
iurhiri:iurhiri                 # blood
jájki:jájki                     # hand
janhaskua:janhaskua             # vision
janikua:janikua                 # rain
jantsiri:jantsiri               # foot
jantspiri:jantspiri             # servant
jatatsikua:jatatsikua           # bed
jeiaki:jeiaki                   # thief
jiuakuarhikua:jiuakuarhikua     # scream
jiuatsï:jiuatsï                 # coyote
jonguarhikua:jonguarhikua       # girdle
juáta:juáta                     # woods
kambanu:kambanu                 # bell
katamba:katamba                 # tongue/language
kauaru:kauaru                   # hill
kekua:kekua                     # stairs/ladder
komarhikua:komarhikua           # prayer
kuaraki:kuaraki                 # squirell
kuarasï:kuarasï                 # duck
kuechenda:kuechenda             # saliva
kurucha:kurucha                 # fish
kustakua:kustakua               # instrument
mintsita:mintsita               # heart
misitu:misitu                   # cat

LEXICON LocativeRoot

kwártu:kwártu                   # room
táa:táa                         # house
anátapu:anátapu                 # tree

LEXICON Adjective

máteru:máteru                   # other
nómeni:nómeni                   # not/negative
pimbinhasï:pimbinhasï           # clean/holy
aspiti:aspiti                   # tasty
charhapiti:charhapiti           # red

LEXICON Preposition
jimbo:jimbo                     # for (is actually a prep/conj)
para:para                       # for
xinkóni:xinkóni                 # at

LEXICON Determiner

ka:ka                           # and
ima:ima                         # he/she/they/that
ísï:ísï                         # this/way
jima:jima                       # where
níjtu:níjtu                     # nor
imá:imá                         # that
máru:máru                       # some

LEXICON Number
ma:ma                           # one


LEXICON V-Stem(2)

piré:piré             <tv>    # sing
kw’i:kw’i             <iv>    # sleep
eshé:eshé             <tv>    # see
jwá:jwá               <tv>    # bring
t’iré:t’iré           <tv>    # eat
xanó:xanó             <iv>    # arrive
kachúku:kachúku       <tv>    # cut
xáma:xáma             <tv>    # go around
segíri:segíri         <iv>    # keep on
xwá:xwá               <tv>    # bring
atárant’a:atárant’a   <tv>    # sell
kweráta:kweráta       <iv>    # be missing
eró:eró               <iv>    # wait
kwánita:kwánita       <iv>    # borrow/lend
íntsku:íntsku         <tv>    # give
enga:enga             <iv>    # belonging
uarhij:uarhij         <iv>    # die
pójpeni:pójpeni       <tv>    # quench
k’amára:k’amára       <tv>    # finish
wántiku:wántiku       <tv>    # kill
xwá:xwá               <tv>    # bring !!add spellrelax
pyá:pyá               <tv>    # buy
k’waníra:k’waníra     <tv>    # throw
ewá:ewá               <tv>    # take away
intsikurhi:intsikurhi <tv>    # give away
kwaká:kwaká           <tv>    # wet
kurhú:kurhú           <tv>    # burn
ikía:ikía             <iv>    # get angry
míti:míti             <tv>    # know/realize
wéka:wéka             <tv>    # love
segíri:segíri         <iv>    # keep on
uéjki:uéjki           <tv>    # want
te:te                 <iv>    # be sweet
ambajtsïku:ambajtsïku <tv>    # comb #1
ambakerani:ambakerani <tv>    # clean
ambakeranta:ambakeranta <tv>  # heal
ambamandi:ambamandi   <iv>    # wake up
andajpinu:andajpinu   <iv>    # born
andangu:andangu       <tv>    # reach
andanguta:andanguta   <tv>    # finish
anhaxurhi:anhaxurhi   <iv>    # get up
arhinta:arhinta       <tv>    # read
arhuku:arhuku         <tv>    # divide
atanta:atanta         <tv>    # paint
ataranta:ataranta     <tv>    # sell
axa:axa               <tv>    # send
chata:chata           <tv>    # hammer
chkuandera:chkuandera <iv>    # lie
chuparhi:chuparhi     <tv>    # suck
ch’ana:ch’ana         <tv>    # play
eraa:eraa             <tv>    # watch
incha:incha           <tv>    # enter
iorheata:iorheata     <tv>    # hose
ireka:ireka           <tv>    # live
itsïma:itsïma         <tv>    # drink
itsutani:itsutani     <tv>    # smoke
jakajku:jakajku       <tv>    # believe
jájkundi:jájkundi     <iv>    # be smelly
janhaska:janhaska     <tv>    # undestand
jantspi:jantspi       <tv>    # serve
jarha:jarha           <tv>    # be
jarhoata:jarhoata     <tv>    # help
jata:jata             <tv>    # mount
jatsikuarhi:jatsikuarhi  <tv> # have
jatsiku:jatsiku       <tv>    # place
jikua:jikua           <tv>    # bathe
jirejta:jirejta       <tv>    # breathe
jirinha:jirinha       <tv>    # find
jiska:jiska           <tv>    # hind
jiuakuarhi:jiuakuarhi <tv>    # scream
jiua:jiua             <tv>    # vomit
joku:joku             <tv>    # tie
jorhenda:jorhenda     <tv>    # show
jorhénguarhi:jorhénguarhi <tv>  # learn
jupa:jupa             <tv>    # wash
jurajku:jurajku       <tv>    # leave
juramu:juramu         <tv>    # order
kantspi:kantspi       <tv>    # owe
kárani:kárani         <tv>    # fly
kará:kará             <tv>    # write
karuku:karuku         <tv>    # break
katsarhi:katsarhi     <tv>    # bite
ketsi:ketsi           <tv>    # lower
kuájchaku:kuájchaku   <tv>    # free
kuajpi:kuajpi         <tv>    # defend
kuakara:kuakara       <tv>    # wet
kuenarhi:kuenarhi     <tv>    # lick
kurhira:kurhira       <tv>    # burn
kustani:kustani       <tv>    # plat (instrument)
meremerejku:meremerejku <tv>  # shine
mita:mita             <tv>    # open



LEXICON Punctuation

.<sent>:.
..<sent>:..
...<sent>:...
;<sent>:;
\:<sent>:\:
!<sent>:!
-<guio>:-
—<guio>:—
,<cm>:,
?<sent>:?
'<apos>:'
"<quot>:"
«<lquot>:«
»<rquot>:»
”<rquot>:”
“<lquot>:“
(<lpar>:(
\]<rpar>:\]
\[<lpar>:\[
)<rpar>:)
\\<sent>:\\
\/<sent>:\/


# Resources:
# https://github.com/apertium/lexd/blob/master/Usage.md
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/List_of_symbols
# http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
# http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
# http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
# https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
# https://github.com/hfst/
# http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
